District of Columbia statutes.
5-723.04

Disposition of forfeitures.

Forfeitures in the District of Columbia Police Officers and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Fund established by § 1-712 shall not be applied to increase the annuity of a person, but rather, shall be applied to pay administrative expenses, if and as directed by the District of Columbia Retirement Board, or used to reduce the District’s contributions.

History

Sept. 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 718, ch. 433, § 12(n-4)
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-314, § 2(g), 60 DCR 3466

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-314 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(g) of the Police and Firefighter’s Retirement and Disability Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-33, March 19, 2013, 60 DCR 4630, 20 DCSTAT 493).